Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.035

Background check activities—Fees.

In accordance with RCW 43.135.055, to implement the background check activities conducted pursuant to RCW 18.130.064, the department may establish fees as necessary to recover the cost of these activities and, except as precluded by RCW 43.70.110, the department shall require applicants to submit the required fees along with other information required by the state patrol.

[ 2008 c 285 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—Effective date—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.